Utah statutes.
76-8-407.   Refusing to give tax assessment information, or giving false information.

Every person who unlawfully refuses, upon demand, to give to any county assessor or deputy county assessor a list of his property subject to taxation, or to swear to such list, or who gives a false name, or fraudulently refuses to give his true name when demanded by the assessor in the discharge of his official duties, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

